Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2038
Temporary educational or visiting faculty permit; use.

The holder of a temporary educational permit or of a visiting faculty permit shall be entitled to practice medicine and surgery and any of its allied specialties, including prescribing medicine and controlled substances, while serving in graduate medical education, a fellowship, or a refresher course in the State of Nebraska, but neither the holder of a temporary educational permit nor the holder of a visiting faculty permit shall be qualified to engage in the practice of medicine and surgery or any of its allied specialties within the State of Nebraska and outside of the assigned graduate medical education, fellowship, refresher course, teaching program, or research program.

Laws 1969, c. 560, § 9, p. 2283;

Laws 1971, LB 150, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,107.03;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 696.